Hawaii statutes.
§89-20 Chapter inoperative, when. (a)
If any provision of this chapter jeopardizes the receipt by the State or any
county of any federal grant-in-aid or other federal allotment of money, the
provision shall, insofar as the fund is jeopardized, be deemed to be
inoperative.

(b) The federal Pro-Children Act, as it
relates to smoking at public school indoor facilities, shall preempt this
chapter to the extent the federal act imposes mandatory restrictions on smoking
in the workplace. [L 1970, c 171, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 87, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next